Hawaii statutes.
[§92F-17] Criminal penalties. (a) An
officer or employee of an agency who intentionally discloses or provides a copy
of a government record, or any confidential information explicitly described by
specific confidentiality statutes, to any person or agency with actual
knowledge that disclosure is prohibited, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor,
unless a greater penalty is otherwise provided for by law.

(b) A person who intentionally gains access to
or obtains a copy of a government record by false pretense, bribery, or theft,
with actual knowledge that access is prohibited, or who intentionally obtains
any confidential information by false pretense, bribery, or theft, with actual
knowledge that it is prohibited [by] a confidentiality statute, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor. [L 1988, c 262, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next